Utah statutes.
73-18b-4.   Enforcement of regulations.
(1)  The Board of Parks and Recreation shall designate officers to enforce
board rules made under the authority of this chapter.
(2)  Those officers have the same authority in making arrests and
responsibility in arrest procedures as they have in their other enforcement
activities.
